Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 7.
PUBLIC

OFFICERS
AND EMPLOYEES

Chapter

76 Civil Service Law

77 Compensation Law--Repealed

78 Public Service

79 Leaves of Absence--Repealed

80 Hours of Work--Repealed

81 In-Service Training Programs--Repealed

82 Incentive and Service Awards--Repealed

83 Temporary Intergovernmental Assignment of
Public

Employees--Repealed

84 Standards of Conduct

85 Loyalty

86 Strikes Against the Government--Repealed

87 Public Employees Health Fund--Repealed

87A Hawaii Employer-Union Health Benefits Trust
Fund

87D Voluntary Employees' Beneficiary Association

Trusts--Repealed

88 Pension and Retirement Systems

88D Tax Deferred Compensation Plans for Public
Employees

88E Deferred Compensation Plan

88F Deferred Compensation Retirement Plan for
Part-Time,

Temporary, and Seasonal or Casual Employees

89 Collective Bargaining in Public Employment

89A Office of Collective Bargaining and Managed
Competition

89C Public Officers and Employees Excluded from
Collective

Bargaining

89E Separation Benefits

90 State Policy Concerning the Utilization of
Volunteer

Services

90D Commission for National and Community Service

CHAPTER 76

CIVIL
SERVICE LAW

Part I. General Civil Service Provisions

Section

76-1 Purposes; merit principle

76-1.5 Executive branch workforce demographic
profile

76-2 to 4 Repealed

76-5 Alternatives in providing human resources
program

services

76-5.5 Repealed

76-6 Chapter inoperative, when

76-7 to 10 Repealed

76-11 Definitions

76-11.5 Repealed

76-11.6 Special, research, or demonstration
project

positions

76-12 General powers and duties of director

76-13 Specific duties and powers of director

76-13.5 Classification

76-14 Merit appeals board; duties, and
jurisdiction

76-15 Examination consultants

76-16 Civil service and exemptions

76-17 Rules; policies, standards, and procedures

76-18 Examinations

76-19 to 22 Repealed

76-22.5 Recruitment

76-23 Repealed

76-23.5 Recruitment incentives

76-24 to 26 Repealed

76-27 Probationary service and other
requirements for

membership in the civil service

76-28 Forms required of appointing authorities

76-28.5 Temporary employment in state positions

76-29 Person ineligible for appointment

76-30 Tenure; resignations

76-30.5 Leaves of absence to accept appointed
positions

exempt from the civil service; prohibited

76-31 to 40 Repealed

76-41 Performance appraisal systems; failure to
meet

performance requirements

76-42 Internal complaint procedures

76-43 Layoff

76-44 Repealed

76-45 Suspension

76-46 Discharges; demotions

76-47 Merit appeals boards; appointment,
authority,

procedures

76-48 Repealed

76-49 Subpoenas, oaths

76-50 Compensation and expenses of a merit
appeals board

76-51 Prohibited activities by members of a
merit appeals

board

76-52 to 56 Repealed

Part II. Special Civil Service Provisions
for the

Counties of Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai

76-71 Department of civil service

76-72 to 74 Repealed

76-75 Personnel director

76-76 Deputy director

76-77 Civil service and exemptions

76-78 to 81 Repealed

Part IV. Prohibited Activities--Repealed

76-91, 92 Repealed

Part V. Employee Organizations; Veteran's
Preference;

Other Rights

76-101, 102 Repealed

76-103 Veteran's preference

76-104 to 106 Repealed

Part VI. Hawaii Health Systems
Corporation--Repealed

76-121 to 123 Repealed

Note

This chapter was
extensively revised by L 2000, c 253.

Prior history.

This chapter is based
upon L 1955, c 274, §1, which completely reenacted RL 1945, chapter 2. Chapter
2 was based upon L 1939, c 187, and was amended by L 1947, cc 110, 119; L Sp
1949, cc 4, 45; L 1951, cc 155, 262, 319; L 1953, c 212. Source notes
following each section commence as of L 1955, c 274.

This chapter is
revised to conform to L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §11, which changed the state civil
service administration by vesting in the state director of personnel services
the administration of the state department of personnel services, including the
authority to prescribe rules and regulations, and established the state civil
service commission as an appellate body.

The law is further
revised as superseded by the provisions of the county charters.

Cross References

Nonconsensual common
law liens, see chapter 507D.

Attorney General Opinions

Because the procedure
outlined in §76-2 is limited in its application to interpretations of this
chapter and chapter 77, the constitutionality of any provision of the two
chapters is an issue beyond the bounds of that process. Att. Gen. Op. 97-6.

Case Notes

City and County
of Honolulu does not appear subject to chapter. 68 H. 432, 718 P.2d 1076.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next